Arkansas, session 2025, HB1319.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 26, Chapter 52, Subchapter 4, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
26-52-457. Disabled veteran, spouse of disabled veteran, and surviving
spouse of disabled veteran.
(a) As used in this section, "disabled veteran" means a person who
qualifies for a property tax exemption under § 26-3-306.
(b)(1) The gross receipts and gross proceeds derived from the sale of
tangible personal property, specified digital products, a digital code, or
services to a disabled veteran, a spouse of a disabled veteran, or a
surviving spouse of a disabled veteran if the surviving spouse has not
remarried are exempt from the gross receipts tax levied by this chapter.
*JLL132*
01/30/2025 9:42:34 AM JLL132

HB1319
(2) The exemption provided in this section:
(A) Applies only to sales made at a physical location in
the state; and
(B) Does not apply to:
(i) A sales and use tax levied by a local
government; or
(ii) The compensating use tax levied by the Arkansas
Compensating Tax Act of 1949, § 26-53-101 et seq.
(c) To claim the exemption allowed under this section:
(1) A disabled veteran shall:
(A) Obtain an identification card from the Department of
Veterans Affairs; and
(B) Present the identification card obtained under
subdivision (c)(1)(A) of this section at the time of an exempt purchase; and
(2) The surviving spouse of a deceased disabled veteran shall
submit a letter to the Department of Finance and Administration from the
United States Department of Veterans Affairs certifying that he or she is the
unremarried surviving spouse of a disabled veteran.
(d)(1) The maximum amount that may be claimed in a calendar year by a
taxpayer as an exemption under this section is five thousand dollars
($5,000).
(2) The Department of Finance and Administration may request a
person claiming an exemption under this section to provide a statement
executed under oath that the amount of the exemption claimed under this
section has not exceeded the limitation provided in subdivision (d)(1) of
this section.
(3) If a taxpayer claiming an exemption under this section
exceeds the limitation provided in subdivision (d)(1) of this section, the
amount claimed as exempt in excess of the limitation shall be treated as a
direct sales tax liability, and the Department of Finance and Administration
may recover the sales tax, including any applicable penalties and interest,
by the use of any method authorized by law.
(e) A seller accepting an identification card under this section to
process an exempt transaction shall:
(1) Use the serial number on the identification card to process
the exempt transaction; and
01/30/2025 9:42:34 AM JLL132

HB1319
(2) Include each serial number used under subdivision (e)(1) of
this section on the sales tax report submitted under this chapter.
(f)(1) The Department of Veterans Affairs, in coordination with the
Department of Finance and Administration, shall issue an identification card
to each eligible person who applies for an identification card under this
section.
(2) An identification card issued under this subsection shall
include without limitation:
(A) A photograph of the disabled veteran to whom the
identification card is issued; and
(B) A unique serial number for purposes of verifying the
exemption allowed under this section.
(g) A person who claims an exemption under this section with a purpose
to defraud upon conviction is guilty of a Class C misdemeanor.
(h) The Department of Veterans Affairs and the Department of Finance
and Administration shall:
(1) Adopt rules to implement and administer this section; and
(2) Collaborate to:
(A) Ensure the secure issuance of identification cards to
disabled veterans; and
(B) Manage the exemption provided under this section.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 26-73-113(a)(1)(A), concerning the
alternative local sales and use tax, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1)(A) In lieu of using all or a portion of its authority to levy a
sales and use tax solely to pay bonded debt under § 14-164-327, the governing
body of any municipality or county may adopt an ordinance levying a tax in
the amount of one-fourth of one percent (0.25%), one-half of one percent
(0.5%), three-fourths of one percent (0.75%), or one percent (1%) upon all
taxable sales of property and services subject to the tax levied by the
Arkansas Gross Receipts Act of 1941, § 26-52-101 et seq., upon the sales of
property and services exempt from the gross receipts tax under § 26-52-457,
and upon the privilege of storing, using, distributing, or consuming within
this state any tangible personal property which is subject to the Arkansas
Compensating Tax Act of 1949, § 26-53-101 et seq. The ordinance or ordinances
must specify that the tax is being levied under this law.
01/30/2025 9:42:34 AM JLL132

HB1319

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 26-74-212(a), concerning the applicability
of the county sales tax levied for capital improvements, is amended to read
as follows:
(a) A county sales tax levied under this subchapter or in § 26-74-301
et seq. shall be applicable to sales of items and services sold by a
business, including items and services exempt from the Arkansas Gross
Receipts Act of 1941, § 26-52-101 et seq., under § 26-52-457, and the tax
shall be administered under the Arkansas Gross Receipts Act of 1941, § 26-52-
101 et seq., and the Arkansas Compensating Tax Act of 1949, § 26-53-101 et
seq.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 26-74-312(b), concerning the administration
and collection of the county sales and use tax for capital improvements, is
amended to read as follows:
(b) In addition to the state gross receipts tax, the secretary shall
collect an additional tax under the authority of this subchapter on the gross
receipts from the sale of all items and services that are subject to the
Arkansas Gross Receipts Act of 1941, § 26-52-101 et seq., and the Arkansas
Compensating Tax Act of 1949, § 26-53-101 et seq., and all items and services
exempt from the Arkansas Gross Receipts Act of 1941, § 26-52-101 et seq.,
under § 26-52-457.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 26-75-214(b), concerning the administration
and collection of the municipal sales and use tax for capital improvements,
is amended to read as follows:
(b) In addition to the state gross receipts tax and compensating tax,
the secretary shall collect an additional tax under the authority of this
subchapter on the receipts from the sale at retail or on the sale price or
lease or rental price on the storage, use, distribution, or other consumption
of all taxable items and services subject to the Arkansas Gross Receipts Act
of 1941, § 26-52-101 et seq., and the Arkansas Compensating Tax Act of 1949,
§ 26-53-101 et seq., and all items and services exempt from the Arkansas
Gross Receipts Act of 1941, § 26-52-101 et seq., under § 26-52-457.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 26-75-405(a), concerning the items subject
01/30/2025 9:42:34 AM JLL132

HB1319
to the temporary municipal sales and use tax for the acquisition,
construction, or improvement of parks, is amended to read as follows:
(a) When any city or town levies a sales and use tax pursuant to the
authority granted in this subchapter, the tax shall be levied upon the same
sales and the same items and services as are subject to taxation under the
Arkansas Gross Receipts Act of 1941, § 26-52-101 et seq., and the Arkansas
Compensating Tax Act of 1949, § 26-53-101 et seq., and upon the items and
services exempt from the Arkansas Gross Receipts Act of 1941, § 26-52-101 et
seq., under § 26-52-457.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 26-75-502(a), concerning the authority to
levy a municipal gross receipts tax, is amended to read as follows:
(a) Any city of the first class or city of the second class having a
population of not more than forty thousand (40,000) persons according to the
most recent federal census and that has been or may in the future be
designated as a model city under the Demonstration Cities and Metropolitan
Development Act of 1966, 42 U.S.C. § 3301 et seq., by an ordinance passed by
its governing body, may levy a tax for the benefit of the city of not to
exceed one percent (1%) on gross proceeds or gross receipts derived from
sales, as such sales and gross proceeds or gross receipts are defined in the
Arkansas Gross Receipts Act of 1941, § 26-52-101 et seq., and the Arkansas
Compensating Tax Act of 1949, § 26-53-101 et seq., and on sales of property
and services exempt from the Arkansas Gross Receipts Act of 1941, § 26-52-101
et seq., under § 26-52-457.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 26-81-104(a)(1), concerning the amount of a
tax levied under the Multicounty Airport and Riverport Financing Act, is
amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) Any tax levied pursuant to the authority of this chapter shall
be a tax equal to one percent (1%) on the sales price on items of personal
property and services sold or to be used in the levying county to the extent
of and subject to the exemptions with respect to the gross receipts tax and
compensating use tax as set forth in the Arkansas Gross Receipts Act of 1941,
§ 26-52-101 et seq., and the Arkansas Compensating Tax Act of 1949, § 26-53-
101 et seq., respectively, except that personal property and services exempt
from the Arkansas Gross Receipts Act of 1941, § 26-52-101 et seq., under §
01/30/2025 9:42:34 AM JLL132

HB1319
26-52-457 are subject to the tax levied under this section.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 26-82-102(9), concerning the definitions to
be used under the Local Sales and Use Tax Economic Development Project
Funding Act, is amended to read as follows:
(9) “Local sales and use tax” means a tax levied under this
chapter on the gross proceeds or gross receipts derived from sales within a
city or county of all items that are: subject
(A) Subject to taxation under the Arkansas Gross Receipts
Act of 1941, § 26-52-101 et seq., or the Arkansas Compensating Tax Act of
1949, § 26-53-101 et seq.; and
(B) Exempt from the Arkansas Gross Receipts Act of 1941, §
26-52-101 et seq., under § 26-52-457;

SECTION 10. DO NOT CODIFY. EFFECTIVE DATE. Sections 1-9 of this act
are effective on the first day of the calendar quarter following the
effective date of this act.



















01/30/2025 9:42:34 AM JLL132